Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.011

License required.

No person may practice as a dental hygienist in this state without having a license as such and, after the first year, an unexpired license renewal certificate.

[ 1987 c 150 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.